test/src/morphology/V-jaeaemae53_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `jäämä: # Verb (53) `jäämä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `jäämä+V+Inf/mA: `jäämä
     `jäämä+V+Inf: jäiäq
     `jäämä+V+ActPrtPrc: jäänüq
     `jäämä+V+PssPrtPrc: jääd
     `jäämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: jää
     `jäämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: [jääs, jääse]
     `jäämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `jäi(e)
     `jäämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: `jäi(e)
